Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202572-811
Vacant buildings and excess land; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 72-811 to 72-818:

(1) Committee means:

(a) The Vacant Building and Excess Land Committee prior to July 1, 2026; and

(b) The Department of Administrative Services beginning July 1, 2026;

(2) Excess, referring to land, means (a) unused in whole or in part by any state agency for the purposes for which the land was acquired or received or (b) without current defined plans by any state agency for the use of the land for the agency's mission for the next fiscal year; and

(3) Vacant, referring to buildings, means (a) unoccupied, (b) unused in whole or in part by any state agency for the purposes for which the building was designed, intended, or remodeled, or (c) without current defined plans by any state agency for the use of the building for the agency's mission for the next fiscal year.

Laws 1988, LB 1143, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 830, § 1;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 567, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 47.